Indiana, session 2026, HB1246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-20-55 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 55. Temporary Assistance for Needy Families;
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; Financial Literacy
Education
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to a person who is:
(1) at least eighteen (18) years of age; and
(2) a:
(A) member of a family that receives TANF (as defined in
IC 12-7-2-189.7) benefits; or
(B) recipient of SNAP (as defined in IC 12-7-2-178.9)
benefits.
Sec. 2. (a) The department shall establish and administer a
course of instruction on financial literacy that a person described
in section 1 of this chapter shall complete.
(b) To carry out subsection (a), the department may cooperate
2026 IN 1246—LS 6861/DI 154


with a reputable association or organization having as an objective
the promotion of financial literacy.
(c) The course of instruction described in subsection (a) shall:
(1) be offered to a person described in section 1 of this chapter
at no cost;
(2) be offered in person, online, and in a hybrid in person and
online format;
(3) comply with the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C.
12101 et seq.); and
(4) be trauma informed and culturally responsive.
Sec. 3. Upon completing the course of instruction described in
section 2(a) of this chapter, the department shall:
(1) give a person described in section 1 of this chapter a
certificate of completion; and
(2) provide information about relevant community programs
to a person described in section 1 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. The department may provide incentives for completing
the course of instruction described in section 2(a) of this chapter.
Sec. 5. Not later than December 31 of each year, the department
shall submit to the executive director of the legislative services
agency for distribution to the members of the general assembly a
report listing the number of persons described in section 1 of this
chapter who have completed the course of instruction described in
section 2(a) of this chapter in the preceding calendar year.
Sec. 6. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1246—LS 6861/DI 154